California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(6) A notice signed by the applicant or the applicant’s representative that the department may obtain criminal record information during the course of a licensing investigation or upon presentation with a reasonable basis to believe the licensee has been convicted of a crime. An applicant whose application is incomplete shall be given written notice that a failure to complete the application within 60 calendar days shall result in denial of the application.

(b) The documents and information procured pursuant to this section shall be considered the records of a consumer and shall not be construed to be a public record. The documents and information shall remain confidential, except in actions brought by the department to enforce this division, or as a result of the issuance of a subpoena in accordance with Section 1985.4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The unauthorized release of the documents received from the Department of Justice or the information contained in those documents, is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.1.

In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, each application for a license, except for an application for a cash buying processor license, shall include an affidavit in which the applicant affirms that he or she is current in making all payments required under undisputed contract agreements, and that he or she will do all of the following:

(a) Abide by all provisions of this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101).

(b) Prepare and retain financial records adequate to document all transactions with suppliers.

(c) Prepare and retain current financial information, including, but not limited to, profit and loss statements and a balance sheet that presents fairly the financial condition as of the end of the applicant’s most recent fiscal year.

The affidavit shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary and shall be submitted under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.2.

Any balance sheet or financial information prepared, retained, or submitted as required by this chapter that shows the applicant to be in an unsound financial condition that impairs the ability to pay farm products creditors in full for farm products received or handled is sufficient grounds to deny the application for license or the renewal of a license. The denial of the application for a license or renewal of a license relating to an unsound financial condition shall include a notice and an opportunity for a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.3.

(a) If the secretary is not satisfied that an applicant or licensee is financially responsible, the secretary may, in lieu of denying, suspending, or revoking the license, accept an irrevocable guarantee of the obligations of the licensee to all California farm product creditors. The irrevocable guarantee may include a personal or corporate guarantee, a certificate of deposit, a bank letter of credit, or a surety bond, as determined to be appropriate by the secretary, and
 shall be in an amount that is at least sufficient to pay for the licensee’s obligations at the time the guarantee is issued. The guarantee shall be for any period, in any form, and in any amount that the secretary may, from time to time, require. The secretary may, as a condition of accepting and maintaining the guarantee, require the guarantor to supply financial information to the secretary at times and to the extent the secretary deems advisable.

(b) A
 guarantee placed with the secretary
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall support an action in a court of competent jurisdiction by a farm products creditor for obligations of the licensee to the creditor and by a state officer for the obligations of the licensee to the state related to transactions subject to the guarantee.

(c) An irrevocable guarantee accepted by the secretary pursuant to this section shall not operate as a release for purposes of Section 55637.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 465, Sec. 1.   (AB 907)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.4.

If at any time the secretary has cause or reason to believe that any applicant or licensee is in an unsound financial condition so as to impair his or her ability to pay farm products creditors in full for farm products received or handled, or for any reason the secretary deems advisable, the secretary may require an applicant or licensee to file with him or her a balance sheet or statement of financial position that presents fairly the financial condition of the licensee. The financial statement, if not prepared by a public accountant or certified public accountant, shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary and shall be submitted under penalty of perjury. Any balance sheet submitted that does not provide the information required by the secretary may be rejected until the information is provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.5.

Failure to file a financial statement as required by this chapter or to comply with the affidavit requirements of Section 55523.1 is a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55523.6.

Any financial statement submitted to the secretary pursuant to this chapter is confidential and shall not be divulged except at a hearing before the secretary or under subpoena, if necessary, for the proper determination of any court proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55524.

The department shall accept or deny an application within 90 calendar days of receipt of a completed application. The department may deny, condition, suspend, or revoke a license issued pursuant to this chapter upon any of the following grounds and in the manner provided in this chapter:

(a) Upon one flagrant violation, as determined by the department, or repeated violations, by the holder or applicant, of any one or combination of the sections of this division or under any one or combination of the regulations promulgated by the department under the authority of this division.

(b) Upon one flagrant violation, as determined by the department, or repeated violations, by a holder’s or applicant’s agent, employee, or contractor, or of an organization or entity in which the holder or applicant holds a significant financial interest, of any one or combination of the sections of this division or any one or combination of the regulations promulgated under this division under circumstances where the holder or applicant knew or should have known and failed to take reasonable measures to prevent the violation or failed to report the violation to the department on learning of the violation.

(c) On the conviction of the holder or applicant of a crime that includes as one of its elements the financial victimization of another person. However, if the licensee was licensed prior to January 1, 1998, and the department knew of, or was on notice of, the conviction, that conviction may not form the basis of a discipline under this subdivision.

(d) On the grounds of a false or misleading statement by a holder or applicant that the holder or applicant knew or should have known to be false or misleading, directed to any official of any government concerning the scope of any indicia of authority, including, but not limited to, the holder’s or applicant’s license associated with the holder’s or applicant’s business, the standards under which the indicia was authorized, the contents of the application for licensure, or the holder’s or applicant’s relationship to the indicia.

(e) On the grounds that a holder or applicant, or a holder’s or applicant’s agency, employee, or contractor, or an organization or entity in which a holder or applicant holds a significant financial interest, deceived a grower in any material matter. Deception, for purposes of this subdivision, does not require scienter, but requires active misrepresentation where the actor knew the representation to be false or where the actor should have known, with due consideration, that he or she did not know whether or not the representation was true or false.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55524.5.

(a) The Legislature finds there to be a substantial nexus between the conduct specified in Section 55524 and an applicant’s or holder’s fitness for licensure.

(b) The department shall not dismiss an action where a violation, however minor, has been established. The department shall not dismiss an action because the applicant or holder establishes factors in mitigation.

(c) However, the department may impose discipline other than denial or revocation of the license. As an alternative to revocation of a license, the department may stay a revocation subject to terms for a period of probation. As an alternative to denial the department may issue a license subject to conditions. Terms of probation or terms of conditional licensure may include, but are not limited to, a requirement of restitution, payment for extra audits, immediate revocation on a new violation, or any other terms that respond to the particular violations or circumstances found.

(d) Once a finding of a violation has been made, the department may consider the following factors in assessing the appropriate level of discipline:

(1) The relative isolation or infrequency of the conduct.

(2) Whether the conduct was a part of a pattern or practice.

(3) Whether the actor had been warned before.

(4) Whether the actor considered the consequences of the conduct.

(5) Whether the actor reasonably relied on others.

(6) The severity of the consequences.

(7) The mens rea of the actor.

(8) In the case of a criminal conviction, evidence of rehabilitation.

(9) The total licensing history.

(e) The following factors shall not be considered in assessing the appropriate level of discipline:

(1) The social or economic contributions of the applicant or holder.

(2) General testimonials as to good character and worthiness to be licensed.

(3) Economic hardship on the licensee.

(4) “Mercy of the court” pleas in connection with criminal convictions, pattern or practice violations, or deception.

(5) In the case of a felony criminal conviction, the department shall not consider rehabilitation unless the convicted person has a valid certificate of rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55524.75.

(a) If an application for a license indicates, or the department determines during the application review process, that the applicant was issued a license that was revoked within the preceding two years, the department shall cease any further review of the application until two years have elapsed from the date of the revocation. The cessation of review shall not constitute a denial of the application for the purposes of this chapter, or any other provision of law.

(b) If an application for a license indicates, or the department determines during the application review process, that the applicant had previously applied for a license and the application was denied within the last year, the department shall cease further review of the application until one year has elapsed from the date of the notification of the denial or from the effective date of the decision and order of the department upholding a denial. The cessation of review shall not constitute a denial of the new applicant for purposes of this chapter, or any other provision of law.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) or (b) prohibits the department from taking into account the basis for denial or revocation in considering any new application subsequent to the elapse of the applicable period of prohibition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55525.

The applicant shall satisfy the department of the applicant’s character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business that is stated in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55525.75.

(a) The withdrawal of an application for a license after it has been filed with the department does not deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a proceeding against the applicant or to enter an order denying the license, unless the department consents in writing to the withdrawal.

(b) The expiration or forfeiture by operation of law of a license, or its forfeiture or cancellation by order of the department or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the department, does not deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the holder upon
 any ground provided by law or to enter an order revoking the license or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the holder.

(c) Any action brought by the department against an applicant or holder does not abate by reason of the sale or other transfer of ownership of the business that is a party to the action, except with the written consent of the department.

(d) Nothing in this division or in any other provision of this code deprives the department of the authority to settle or adjudicate a disposition of a case other than by revocation or denial. The department or the department’s designee may compromise with the applicant or holder in a written stipulation and order. The department may, following a hearing, order probation on terms and conditions as determined by the
 department. The authority conferred by this subdivision shall include, but is not limited to, the authority to order payment of amounts determined owing to California farm product creditors, the authority to dismiss an action on the department’s own initiative, the authority to order administrative penalties, the authority to order a respondent to pay
 for heightened audit scrutiny, the authority to suspend a license for a period of years, or any combination of remedies other than final revocation or denial of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 465, Sec. 2.   (AB 907)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

55527.5.

Any person who is adjudicated liable for payment of a claim for farm products which arose out of the conduct of a business licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101), and who has not made full settlement with all producer-creditors, shall not be licensed by the director as a principal for four years from the date of the adjudication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 662, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

55527.6.

(a) Licensees or applicants for a license shall be required to furnish and maintain an irrevocable guarantee in a form and amount satisfactory to the secretary if, within the preceding four years, the secretary determines that they have done any of the following:

(1) Engaged in conduct which demonstrates a lack of financial responsibility, including, but not limited to, delinquent accounts payable, judgments of liability, insolvency, or bankruptcy.

(2) Failed to assure future financial responsibility unless an irrevocable guarantee is provided.

(3) Otherwise violated this chapter which resulted in license revocation.

(b) The irrevocable guarantee may include a personal or corporate guarantee, a certificate of deposit, a bank letter of credit, or a surety bond, as determined to be appropriate by the secretary.

(c) The guarantee shall not be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or 20 percent of the annual dollar volume of business based on farm product value returned to the grower, whichever is greater, as assurance that the licensee’s or applicant’s business will be conducted in accordance with this chapter and that the licensee or applicant will pay all amounts due farm products creditors.

(d) The secretary, based on changes in the nature and volume of business conducted by the licensee, may require an increase or authorize a reduction in the amount of the guarantee, but in no case shall the guarantee be reduced below ten
 thousand dollars ($10,000). A licensee who is notified by the secretary to provide a guarantee in an increased amount shall do so within a reasonable time as specified by the secretary. If the licensee fails to do so, the secretary may, after a notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend or revoke the license of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 69.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

55528.

(a) The department shall notify the applicant or holder in writing of the department’s decision to bring charges to deny or revoke a license.

(1) The notice shall inform the applicant or holder of the charges against him or her, of the department’s proposed disciplinary action, and of his or her rights under this chapter.

(2) The notice shall be served by certified mail to the applicant’s or holder’s last known address.

(3) The notice shall be mailed to the applicant or holder at least 30 calendar days in advance of the impending action.

(b) The department’s proposed action shall become final unless the applicant or holder appeals prior to the end of the notice period by submitting a notice of defense to the department in a form specified by the department. The notice shall be transmitted to the department in a form that is written, including, but not limited to, by facsimile.

(c) If the department receives a timely notice of defense, the department shall schedule a hearing within 90 calendar days of receipt of the notice of defense. Pending the final decision at the conclusion of the hearing, a revocation shall be stayed.

(d) Proceedings for the revocation or denial of a license issued under this chapter shall be conducted by hearing officers appointed for that purpose by the department. The department may elect to use hearing officers employed by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The hearing officers shall be independent of the Market Enforcement Bureau, but may be employees of the department. The hearing officers shall be qualified administrative law judges.

(e) Proceedings shall be conducted generally in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, proceedings need not conform strictly to any “rules of court” adopted as regulations by the Office of Administrative Hearings to guide the conduct of hearings conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The department has all power granted by Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(1) The sole parties to the proceedings shall be the department and the applicant or holder. Third party intervention shall not be permitted. The disputes, claims, and interests of third parties shall not be within the jurisdiction of the proceedings. However, nothing in this paragraph prohibits any interested party from submitting an amicus brief if the hearing officer requests written briefs.

(2) The validity of a department regulation or order shall not be within jurisdiction of the proceedings.

(3) Law and motion matters shall be handled by the assigned hearing officer.

(4) The hearing officer may not enter into settlement discussions.

(5) The hearing officer may not issue sanctions.

(f) In all proceedings conducted in accordance with this section, the standard of proof to be applied is the preponderance of the evidence. When the department seeks to revoke an existing license, the department shall have the burden of proof and the burden of producing evidence.

(g) Decisions following a hearing shall be adopted by the department or the department’s designee and become final unless remanded for reconsideration or alternated in accordance with Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) The department shall maintain a library of decisions that shall be made available to any person, including the parties to administrative actions during discovery.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

55530.

Each licensed processor shall post his license, or a copy of it, in his office or salesroom in plain view of the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Sale of Farm Products by Weight [55581. - 55581.]

55581.

If any farm product is sold to and purchased by any processor on the basis of weight, such product shall be weighed by a weighmaster licensed under the laws of this state, and a certificate as to such weight issued by him shall be delivered to the seller by the processor or by the weighmaster as agent for the processor. Settlement for such product shall be made on the basis of the weight which is shown on the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Processors [55601. - 55613.]

55601.

Every processor shall pay for any farm product which is delivered to the processor at the time and in the manner which is specified in the contract with the producer. If no time is set by such contract, or at the time of delivery, then the processor shall pay for the farm product within 30 days of the delivery or taking possession of such farm product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.1.

Section 55601.5 shall be known, and may be cited as, the “Clare Berryhill Grape Crush Report Act of 1976.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.3.

Upon the following, the processor shall notify the seller, on a form to be prescribed by the department, as to the requirements set forth in Sections 55601 and 55881:

(a) Upon delinquency of a contract.

(b) If payment is not made within 30 days when the contract does not specify time of payment or if there is no contract.

(c) If payment is not made within 30 days when the contract is oral, irrespective of the agreed time of payment.

The processor shall have the burden of proof as to the timely delivery of such a notice.

Such a notice shall only be required as to the first contract between any particular seller and processor during any one calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.4.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 55601, every processor who purchases livestock for slaughter shall make full payment of such livestock, by the transfer of collected funds to the seller’s account, within two business days from the delivery of such livestock to the processor.

For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day which is a business day under the provisions of Section 9 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 55461, on or before January 31 of every year, every processor who crushes grapes in this state shall furnish to the secretary, on forms provided by the secretary, a report that includes all of the following:

(A) The total number of tons of grapes purchased by the processor in this state during the preceding crush within each grape-pricing district, broken down by total tons purchased, variety, and price, including any bonuses or allowances, and sugar calculations.

(B) The total number of tons of grapes purchased by the processor in this state in nonrelated purchases
 during the preceding crush within each grape-pricing district, broken down by total tons purchased, variety, and price, including any bonuses or allowances, and sugar calculations.

(C) The total number of tons of each variety of grape crushed within each grape-pricing district and the average sugar content of each variety within each grape-pricing district.

(D) The total number of tons of grapes purchased and crushed that are expected, as of the date of reporting by the processor, to be marketed as grape concentrate. In reporting tons purchased and crushed that are expected to be marketed as grape concentrate, processors may estimate equivalent tonnage. In estimating the equivalent tonnage, the processor shall include all equivalent tons crushed for the production of grape
 concentrate for wine and all other purposes marketed outside the state and the equivalent tons crushed for the production of grape concentrate for all purposes other than wine marketed within the state. In determining the estimated equivalent tons, processors shall make their best estimate of the gallons of concentrate per ton of grapes crushed based upon the Brix level of the grapes used in concentrate production.

(2) (A) When reporting price within the category of all tonnage purchased, processors shall include grapes purchased from (i) growers for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, and beverage brandy, (ii) another processor only if that processor was also the grower of the grapes, (iii) growers that are considered separate entities from the processor operation, or (iv) growers or other processors, but not by the
 reporting processor; and shall exclude (i) material other than grapes, and defects, or other weight adjustments deducted from the gross-weight ticket, (ii) any raisin-distilling material, (iii) grapes grown by the processor from vineyards that are not considered separate entities, (iv) grapes purchased from other processors that were previously purchased from growers, or (v) grapes crushed to grower accounts or crushed for other wineries. If several varieties were packaged together and purchased for one price, the processor shall report the average price per ton as one mixed lot, and when reporting crush information, shall report individual variety and tonnage information.

(B) When reporting price within the category of nonrelated purchases, processors shall exclude tonnage of grapes purchased from a grower if, during the reporting
 year (i) the grower or an affiliate of the grower, or both the grower and the affiliate of the grower, owned, directly or indirectly, at least 5 percent of the indicia of ownership or voting authority of the processor, (ii) the processor or an affiliate of the processor, or both the processor and the affiliate of the processor, owned, directly or indirectly, at least 5 percent of the indicia of ownership or voting authority of the grower, or (iii) the processor or an affiliate of the processor, or both the processor and the affiliate of the processor, provided long-term financing to the grower in exchange for rights or options to purchase a significant portion of the grower’s harvest.

(b) On or before February 25 of every year, each processor who crushes grapes in this state shall furnish to the secretary information concerning the final
 prices, including any bonuses or allowances, paid by variety and grape-pricing district to all growers holding reference price contracts in effect before January 1, 1977, which payments have not been reported on January 31.

(c) (1) The secretary may not release or otherwise make available any information furnished by an individual processor under this section, except in proceedings brought against the processor by the secretary for the purpose of enforcing this section, or except in the case of a producer who holds any reference price-grape purchase contract, to whom the secretary may furnish, upon request and at a reasonable cost, the information needed to verify the reference price, including any bonuses or allowances, set forth in the contract.

(2) The
 secretary shall not release or otherwise make available any information furnished by an individual processor under this section to any other division of the department except in accordance with a subpoena issued in accordance with Section 1985.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(3) The secretary shall release only aggregate figures for grapes crushed that are expected to be marketed as grape concentrate and shall not include information by district, types, or variety.

(d) The secretary shall enforce the collection of the information and, on or before March 15 of each year, shall publish a preliminary summary report on the preceding crush. The report shall include all of the following information:

(1) The weighted average
 price paid on the basis of the prices, including any bonuses or allowances, reported and average sugar content for each grape variety purchased within each grape-pricing district.

(2) The total number of tons of grapes crushed and the average sugar content for each grape variety within each grape-pricing district.

(3) Each price category paid, separated by sugar calculations, if any, and the percentage each represents of the total for each variety within each grape-pricing district.

(4) Commencing with the report for the 1997 crush, in a separate and independent table without affecting or modifying existing tables, by weighted average price only, nonrelated purchases, by variety within each grape-pricing
 district excluding any bonuses, allowances, sugar calculations, and tonnage.

(e) On or before April 30 of each year, the secretary shall publish a final summary report, which shall contain all of the data furnished by the processors on or before January 31 and on or before February 25 of each year covering purchases under reference price contracts. The secretary may publish an addendum or supplemental report when reasonably necessary to correct any erroneous or misleading information contained in the annual report required by this section.

(f) The forms provided to processors by the secretary pursuant to this section shall provide for the separate reporting of grapes used by a processor (1) as distilling material and (2) for both beverage brandy and other than beverage brandy. A
 processor shall report all grapes used as distilling material by variety. The secretary, in determining the weighted average price paid for each grape variety purchased within each grape-pricing district, shall not include the prices paid for grapes of any variety used as distilling material for other than beverage brandy in determining the weighted average price. The secretary’s report shall include a separate summary regarding grapes used by processors as distilling material.

(g) All grape purchase contracts entered into on or after January 1, 1977, shall provide for a final price, including any bonuses or allowances, to be set on or before the January 31 following delivery of the grapes purchased. Any grape purchase contract entered into in violation of this subdivision is illegal and unenforceable. For the purpose of this section,
 a grape purchase contract shall not include any existing supply contract between a nonprofit cooperative association and a commercial processor.

(h) (1) If the department reasonably believes that a processor has failed, refused, or neglected to provide the information required by this section, or if the department finds apparent discrepancies in the information reported, the department may audit or investigate in accordance with Article 11 (commencing with Section 55721) or proceed in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 55521), except as specified in paragraph (6). Injunctive relief under Section 55921 shall issue only upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that a processor has done any of the following:

(A) Refused to submit
 required information after the department provides reasonable notice to the processor of the processor’s obligations and rights under this chapter.

(B) Misreported a fact, knowing that fact to be false, or in reckless disregard for whether the fact was true.

(2) Both the refusal to submit after the provision of reasonable notice and the misreporting of a fact under the circumstances set forth in this subdivision shall constitute violations of this chapter. Neither a refusal to submit nor a misreporting of a fact under this subdivision shall be prosecuted pursuant to Article 18 (commencing with Section 55901) or subject to civil penalties under Article 19 (commencing with Section 55921).

(3) In the case of misreporting in any
 action authorized by this section, it shall be a defense for a processor to rely on information provided to the processor by a producer with respect to whether a purchase is a related purchase.

(4) In the case of a refusal to report or misreporting, the department shall not commence an audit or investigation, other than a routine audit based on scientifically proven random sampling methods, without first disclosing to the processor being audited or investigated any and all information that constitutes the department’s belief that the processor has not complied, including the identities of all persons providing information on potential violations to the department.

(5) Anonymous complaints, unattributable information, or undocumented information shall not constitute reasonable
 belief and shall not be the basis for any investigation or audit action brought under this section. The department shall inform the processor of its reasons for auditing.

(6) No action shall be taken pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 55521), Article 18 (commencing with Section 55901), or Article 19 (commencing with Section 55921) based on the reporting of grape concentrate pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Affiliate” or “affiliated with” means a person who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control of another person.
 For purposes of this paragraph, “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person.

(2) “Estimated equivalent tons,” when used in the context of reporting tons purchased and crushed that will be marketed as grape concentrate, shall be determined by use of the following formulas:

(A) Gallons of concentrate (approximately 20 degrees Brix) produced divided by 40 equals equivalent tons.

(B) Gallons of concentrate (approximately 68 degrees Brix) divided by 170 equals equivalent tons.

(3) “Grape-pricing district” means a district used by the federal-state cooperative market
 news services, as provided in Section 58231.

(4) “Long-term financing” means financing that by its terms is due over a period of more than one year, or more than 180 days if there is a purchase agreement between a grower and a processor, or if there is a farming agreement where the purchase price is on a per-acre basis.

(5) “Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, company, or other entity.

(6) “Purchase” means the taking by sale, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, issue or reissue, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in property. For purposes of this
 paragraph, “sale” means the passing of title from the seller to the buyer for a price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 3.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.6.

(a) To provide funds to carry out Section 55601.5, each processor who crushes more than 100 tons of grapes in California shall pay to the secretary the amount determined by the secretary to be necessary to cover these costs, but not to exceed ten cents ($0.10) per ton of grapes received for crushing, fresh weight equivalent, during each marketing season beginning July 1 and ending the following June 30. However, five cents ($0.05) per ton of grapes received for crushing, or one-half of the fee if the fee is less than ten cents ($0.10), shall be paid by the processor who crushes grapes and five cents ($0.05) per ton of grapes received for crushing, including any grapes produced by the processor, or one-half of the fee if the fee is less
 than ten cents ($0.10), shall be paid by the processor who crushes grapes and may be deducted from moneys owed to the producer.

(b) The amount of the fee shall be paid to the secretary on or before January 31 of each year on all grapes received for crushing through December 15. The amount of the fee on grapes received for crushing after December 15 shall be paid to the secretary on or before June 30 of that marketing season.

(c) The secretary may fix the fee at a lesser amount and may adjust the fee from marketing season to marketing season.

(d) A processor who crushes grapes who fails, neglects, or refuses to pay the required fee shall be in violation of this chapter. A processor who crushes grapes shall not be entitled to pass
 the penalty on to the producer of the grapes.

(e) If the secretary conducts an acreage survey pursuant to Section 55613, the secretary may increase the fee charged pursuant to subdivision (a) by not more than four cents ($0.04) per ton of grapes received for crushing, fresh weight equivalent, to cover costs of the survey. The same ratio of payment between processor and producer shall be maintained if the fee is increased pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) The fee authorized by subdivision (a) for the reports required to be prepared by the secretary pursuant to Section 55601.5 and the increase in that fee authorized by subdivision (e) for the survey authorized by Section 55613 shall be established by the secretary so as to generate only the amount of revenue that the secretary reasonably
 anticipates will be needed to cover the cost incurred by the secretary in gathering and producing the reports required by Section 55601.5, in conducting the survey authorized by Section 55613, and in conducting related enforcement activities. The funds generated by the fees authorized by this section shall be used only for the purpose of gathering the information and producing the reports required to be prepared by the secretary pursuant to Section 55601.5 and conducting the survey authorized by Section 55613.

(g) All moneys received under this section shall be deposited
 into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

55601.7.
